Utah statutes.
72-2-115.   Transportation Fund balance -- Income -- Allocation.
All interest and earnings and other income derived from the Transportation
Fund balance shall be credited to the Transportation Fund, including the
collector road and B and C road accounts in proportion to the various fund
account balances on an average monthly balance basis.
